North Dakota, session 69, HB1292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 49-19-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
49-19-01. Definition of common pipeline carriers.
Every person:
1. Owning, operating, or managing any pipeline or any part of any pipeline within this
state for the transportation of crude petroleum, gas, or coal, or carbon dioxide to or for
the public for hire, or engaged in the business of transporting crude petroleum, gas, or
coal, or carbon dioxide by pipelines;
2. Owning, operating, managing, or participating in the ownership, operation, or
management of, under lease, contract of purchase, agreement to buy or sell, or other
agreement or arrangement of any kind whatsoever, any pipeline, or any part of any
pipeline, for the transportation of crude petroleum, gas, or coal bought from others
from any oil, gas, or coal field or place of production, to any distributing, refining, or
marketing center or reshipping point;
3. Engaged in the business of producing, purchasing, transporting for hire or transporting
for sale within this state of natural gas, which is transported through pipelines, or any
part of a pipeline, the right of way for which is granted or secured under the provisions
of this chapter or, subject to chapter 32-15, through the exercise of the right of eminent
domain; or
Page No. 1 25.0919.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. Made a common carrier by or under the terms of a contract with or in pursuance
ofunder the laws of the United States, is a common carrier and is subject to the
provisions of this chapter as a common pipeline carrier.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 49-19-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
49-19-11. Pipeline carrier must agree to carry without discrimination.
A common pipeline carrier, in the acceptance of the provisions of this chapter, shall agree
expressly that it, without discrimination, will accept, carry, or purchase, the oil, coal, or gas, or
carbon dioxide of the state or of any person not the owner of any pipeline, operating a lease or
purchasing oil, coal, or gas, or carbon dioxide at prices and under regulations to be prescribed
by the commission.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 49-19-19 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
49-19-19. Discrimination between shippers in facilities furnished, service rendered,
and rates prohibited.
No
1. A common pipeline carrier may not discriminate between or against shippers in regard
to facilities furnished, services rendered, or rates charged under the same or similar
circumstances in the transportation of crude petroleum, coal, or gas, or carbon
dioxide, nor may there be any discrimination in the transportation of crude petroleum,
coal, or gas, or carbon dioxide produced or purchased by itself directly or indirectly. In
this connection the pipeline must be considered as a shipper of the crude petroleum,
coal, or gas, or carbon dioxide produced or purchased by itself directly or indirectly
and handled through its facilities. No such
2. A carrier in such operation, directly or indirectly, may not charge, demand, collect, or
receive from anyone a greater or lesser compensation for any service rendered than
from another for a like contemporaneous service. This section does not limit the right
of the commission to prescribe rates and regulations from or to some places different
from other rates or regulations for transportation from or to other places as it may
determinedetermined by the commission, nor is any carrier guilty of discrimination
when obeying any order of the commission. Where there isWhen offered for
Page No. 2 25.0919.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
transportation more crude petroleum, or coal, or carbon dioxide than can be
transported immediately, the sameproducts must be apportioned equitably. Gas must
be taken on a pro rata basis or on suchthe basis as may be established by the
industrial commission pursuant tounder section 38-08-06.
Page No. 3 25.0919.01000